Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-166
Initial board subject to act; additional qualifications for members.

For professions coming within the scope of the Uniform Credentialing Act for the first time:

(1) A professional member of a board shall not be required to have held and maintained an active credential for a period of five years just preceding his or her appointment. Members appointed during the first five years after a profession comes within the scope of the act shall be required to meet the minimum qualifications for credentialing and shall, insofar as possible, meet the requirements as to years of practice in this state otherwise provided by section 38-164;

(2) All professional members appointed to an initial board shall be credentialed within six months after being appointed to the board or within six months after the date by which members of the profession are required to be credentialed, whichever is later. If for any reason a professional member is not credentialed within such time period, a new professional member shall be appointed to take his or her place;

(3) Members shall be appointed to the initial board within thirty days after the effective or operative date, whichever is later, of the legislation providing for credentialing of the profession; and

(4) The terms of the initial board members shall be as follows: One member shall hold office until December 1 of the third year following the year in which the legislation providing for credentialing of the profession became effective; two, including one public member, until December 1 of the fourth year; and two, including one public member, until December 1 of the fifth year.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 66.